Massachusetts, session 194th, S447.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 2C, the following section:-
Section 2D. Each school district in the commonwealth shall provide instruction in hands
only cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator as part of
the existing physical education or health education curriculum in grades 9 through 12. The
school district may select a no-cost, non-certification instructional program to meet this
requirement. The instructional program provided shall be modeled from an instructional
program established by a nationally recognized association with expertise in instruction in
cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator and include a
hands-on learning component for each participating student. Each public high school student
of 2

shall be required to participate in the instructional program as a requirement for high school
graduation; provided, however, that no student shall be required to take part in the instructional
program if (i) a licensed physician certifies in writing that such participation would be injurious
to the student; or (ii) a parent or guardian for the student submits a written objection to the
student’s participation in the instructional program.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2026.
of 2